Idaho, session 2026, H0972.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Idaho:
SECTION 1. In addition to any other appropriation provided by law,
there is hereby appropriated to the Department of Health and Welfare for
the Division of Welfare the following amounts to be expended for operating
expenditures from the listed funds for the period July 1, 2026, through June
30, 2027, for the purpose of Supplemental Nutrition Assistance Program ad-
ministration:
Cooperative Welfare (General) Fund $351,000
Cooperative Welfare (Federal) Fund 163,000
TOTAL $514,000
SECTION 2. An emergency existing therefor, which emergency is hereby
declared to exist, this act shall be in full force and effect on and after
July 1, 2026.